Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-371
Board of trustees; appointment; procedure.

If said objections are not filed against the district in the time and manner provided in section 23-370, the county board shall forthwith appoint a temporary board of three trustees and all further proceedings shall be in conformity with the provisions of Chapter 39, article 16.

Laws 1961, c. 93, § 4, p. 321.